Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.087

Removal of officers or directors.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing charges in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by ten percent of the members requesting the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members voting, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The director or officer against whom such charges have been brought shall be informed in writing of the charges prior to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses. The person or persons bringing the charges shall have the same opportunity. If the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts, the petition for removal of a director must be signed by the number of members residing in the district from which the officer or director was elected as the articles of incorporation or bylaws specify and, in the absence of such specification, the petition must be signed by ten percent of the members residing in the district. The board of directors must call a special meeting of the members residing in that district to consider the removal of the director. By a vote of the majority of the members of the district voting, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy.

[ 1989 c 307 s 12.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.